New York, session 2025-2026, S6788.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 915-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 915-a. Oneida county school milk pilot program. 1. There is hereby 4 established a school milk pilot program in Oneida county. All public 5 secondary, middle, and high schools in Oneida county may purchase and 6 shall be reimbursed by the state for any purchase of self-serve milk 7 dispensers, bulk milk orders, and milk in shelf-stable aseptic carton 8 packaging. 9 2. The commissioner shall perform a study to analyze how the Oneida 10 county school milk pilot program impacts the milk carton shortage in the 11 state. 12 3. On or before three hundred sixty-five days after the implementation 13 of the Oneida county school milk pilot program, the commissioner shall 14 complete the study conducted pursuant to subdivision two of this section 15 and shall thereafter deliver a copy of the findings of the study and any 16 legislative recommendations such commissioner deems necessary to the 17 governor, the temporary president of the senate, and the speaker of the 18 assembly. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 20 have become a law and shall expire one year after such effective date 21 when upon such date the provisions of this act shall be deemed repealed. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09272-01-5